Massachusetts, session 194th, H3221.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 22 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out the twenty-second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:- 
Twenty-second, Real estate of the following classes of persons who are legal residents of 
the commonwealth and who are veterans, as defined in clause Forty-third of section seven of 
chapter four, and whose last discharge or release from the armed forces was under other than 
dishonorable conditions and who were domiciled in Massachusetts for at least six months prior 
to entering such service, or who have resided in the commonwealth for 2 consecutive years next 
prior to date of filing for exemptions under this clause, hereinafter referred to in this clause as 
soldiers and sailors, provided such real estate is occupied in whole or in part as his domicile by 
such person, and provided, further that if the spouse of the soldier or sailor is also a soldier or 

of 8 11 sailor each shall receive the amount of exemption provided in this clause to the same extent as if 
unmarried, to the amount of two thousand dollars of assessed taxable valuation or the sum of 
$800, whichever would result in an abatement of the greater amount of actual taxes due. No real 
estate shall be so exempt which the assessors shall adjudge has been conveyed to a soldier or 
sailor or to the spouse, surviving spouse, father or mother of a soldier or sailor to evade taxation. 
SECTION 2: Section 22A of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out the twenty-second (A) paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 
paragraph:- 
Twenty-second A, Real estate of soldiers and sailors and their spouses who are legal 
residents of the commonwealth and who are veterans, as defined in clause forty-three of section 
seven of chapter four and whose last discharge or release from the armed forces was under other 
than dishonorable conditions, and who were domiciled in Massachusetts for at least six months 
prior to entering such service or who have resided in the commonwealth for 2 consecutive years 
next prior to date of filing for exemption under this clause, who according to the records of the 
Veterans Administration or of any branch of the armed forces of the United States by reason of 
injury received or disease contracted while in such service and in the line of duty, lost or have 
suffered permanent loss of use of one foot at or above the ankle or lost or have suffered 
permanent loss of use of one hand at or above the wrist, or who according to the records of the 
Veterans Administration by reason of injury received or disease contracted while in such service, 
is receiving a statutory award from the Veterans Administration for such loss or loss of sight of 
one eye, or who have been awarded the congressional medal of honor, the distinguished service 
cross, the navy cross or the air force cross, or who is or was a prisoner of war, to the amount of 
four thousand dollars of the taxable valuation of real property or the sum of $1500 whichever 

of 8 34 would result in an abatement of the greater amount, of actual taxes due, in the case of each 
person, provided that such real estate is occupied as his domicile by such person, and provided, 
further, that if said property be greater than a single family house, then only that value of so 
much of said house as is occupied by said person as his domicile or a proportionate part of 
$1500, whichever would result in an abatement of the greater amount of actual taxes due, shall 
be exempted. After the assessors have allowed an exemption under this clause, no further 
evidence of the existence of the facts required by this clause shall be required in any subsequent 
year in the city or town in which the exemption has been granted; provided, however, that the 
assessors may refuse to grant an exemption in any subsequent year if they become aware that the 
soldier or sailor did not satisfy all of the requisites of this clause at the time the exemption was 
first granted. An exemption under this clause shall continue unchanged for the benefit of the 
surviving spouse after the death of such disabled veteran as long as the surviving spouse of the 
qualified veteran shall remain an owner and occupant of a domicile subject to the exemption. For 
the purposes of this section, the term ''prisoner of war'' shall mean a regularly appointed, 
enrolled, enlisted or inducted member of the military forces of the United States who was 
captured, separated and incarcerated by an enemy of the United States during an armed conflict. 
Two thousand dollars of this exemption or up to the sum of one hundred and seventy-five 
dollars, whichever basis is applicable shall be borne by the city or town; the balance, up to two 
thousand dollars of exemption or up to the sum of $575, whichever basis is applicable, shall be 
borne by the commonwealth; and the state treasurer shall annually reimburse the city or town for 
the amount of the tax which otherwise would have been collected on account of this balance. No 
person who has received an exemption under this clause shall be denied the benefit of the 
exemption because the person returns to active service. 

of 8 57  SECTION 3: Section 22B of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out the twenty-second (B) paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 
paragraph:- 
Twenty-second B, Real estate of soldiers and sailors and their spouses who are legal 
residents of the commonwealth and who are veterans, as defined in clause forty-three of section 
seven of chapter four, and whose last discharge or release from the armed forces was under other 
than dishonorable conditions, and who were domiciled in Massachusetts for at least six months 
prior to entering such service, or who have resided in the commonwealth for 2 consecutive years 
next prior to the date of filing for exemption under this clause, who according to the records of 
the Veterans Administration or of any branch of the armed forces by reason of such service in 
the armed forces of the United States have suffered in the line of duty the loss or permanent loss 
of use of both feet at or above the ankle, or loss or permanent loss of use of both hands at or 
above the wrist or loss or permanent loss of use of one foot at or above the ankle and one hand at 
or above the wrist, or the loss of sight of both eyes as prescribed and certified by the Veterans 
Administration to the amount of eight thousand dollars of the taxable valuation of real property 
or the sum of 2,5000, whichever would result in an abatement of the greater amount of actual 
taxes due, provided, that such real estate is occupied as his domicile by such person, and 
provided, further, that if said property be greater than a single family house then only that value 
of so much of said house as is occupied by said person as his domicile or a proportionate part of 
$2,500 whichever would result in an abatement of the greater amount of actual taxes due, shall 
be exempted. An exemption under this clause shall continue unchanged for the benefit of the 
surviving spouse after the death of such disabled veteran, as long as the surviving spouse of the 
qualified veteran shall remain an owner and occupant of a domicile subject to the exemption. 

of 8 80  After the assessors have allowed an exemption under this clause, no further evidence of 
the existence of the facts required by this clause shall be required in any subsequent year in the 
city or town in which the exemption has been so allowed; provided, however, that the assessors 
may refuse to allow an exemption in any subsequent year if they become aware that the soldier 
or sailor did not satisfy all of the requisites of this clause at the time the exemption was first 
granted. 
Two thousand dollars of this exemption or up to the sum of one hundred and seventy-five 
dollars, whichever basis is applicable, shall be borne by the city or town; the balance up to six 
thousand dollars of exemption or up to the sum of $1,075, whichever basis is applicable, shall be 
borne by the commonwealth; and the state treasurer shall annually reimburse the city or town for 
the amount of the tax which otherwise would have been collected on account of this balance. 
SECTION 4: Section 22C of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out the twenty-second (C) paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 
paragraph:- 
Twenty-second C, Real estate of soldiers and sailors and their spouses who are legal 
residents of the commonwealth who are veterans, as defined in clause forty-three of section 
seven of chapter four, and whose last discharge or release from the armed forces was under other 
than dishonorable conditions, and who were domiciled in Massachusetts for at least six months 
prior to entering such service, or who have resided in the commonwealth for 2 consecutive years 
next prior to date of filing for exemption under this clause, and who according to the records of 
100 the Veterans Administration by reason of such service in the armed forces of the United States 
101 have suffered in the line of duty permanent and total disability, and who by reason of such 

of 8 102 disability have received assistance in acquiring ''specially adapted housing'' under laws 
103 administered by the Veterans Administration to the amount of ten thousand dollars of the taxable 
104 valuation of real property or the sum of $3,000, whichever would result in an abatement of the 
105 greater amount of actual taxes due, provided, that such real estate is occupied as his domicile by 
106 such person, and provided, further, that if said property be greater than a single family house 
107 then only that value of so much of said house as is occupied by said person as his domicile or a 
108 proportionate part of $3,000, whichever would result in an abatement of the greater amount of 
109 actual taxes due, shall be exempted. An exemption under this clause shall continue unchanged 
110 for the benefit of the surviving spouse after the death of such a disabled veteran, as long as the 
111 surviving spouse of the qualified veteran shall remain an owner and occupant of a domicile 
112 subject to the exemption. 
113  After the assessors have allowed an exemption under this clause, no further evidence of 
114 the existence of the facts required by this clause shall be required in any subsequent year in the 
115 city or town in which the exemption has been so allowed; provided, however, that the assessors 
116 may refuse to allow an exemption in any subsequent year if they become aware that the soldier 
117 or sailor did not satisfy all of the requisites of this clause at the time the exemption was first 
118 granted. 
119  Two thousand dollars of this exemption or up to the sum of one hundred and seventy-five 
120 dollars, whichever basis is applicable, shall be borne by the city or town; the balance up to eight 
121 thousand dollars of exemption or up to the sum of $1,325, whichever basis is applicable, shall be 
122 borne by the commonwealth; and the state treasurer shall annually reimburse the city or town for 
123 the amount of the tax which otherwise would have been collected on account of this balance. 

of 8 124  SECTION 5: Section 22E of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
125 striking out the twenty-second (e) paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 
126 paragraph:- 
127  Twenty-second E, Real estate of soldiers and sailors and their spouses who are legal 
128 residents of the commonwealth and who are veterans as defined in clause forty-three of section 
129 seven of chapter four, and who, as a result of disabilities contracted while in such service and in 
130 the line of duty, have a disability rating of one hundred per cent as determined by the Veterans 
131 Administration, and who were domiciled in the commonwealth for at least six months prior to 
132 entering such service, or who have resided in the commonwealth for 2 consecutive years next 
133 prior to date of filing for exemption under this clause, to the amount of six thousand dollars of 
134 the taxable valuation of real property or the sum of $2,000, whichever would result in an 
135 abatement of the greater amount of actual taxes due, provided, that such real estate is occupied as 
136 his domicile by such person; and provided further, that if said property be greater than a single-
137 family house, then only that value of so much of said house as is occupied by said person as his 
138 domicile or a proportionate part of $2,000, whichever would result in an abatement of the greater 
139 amount of actual taxes due, shall be exempted. An exemption under this clause shall continue 
140 unchanged for the benefit of the surviving spouse after the death of such disabled veteran as long 
141 as the surviving spouse of the qualified veteran shall remain an owner and occupant of a 
142 domicile subject to the exemption. 
143  After the assessors have allowed an exemption under this clause, the assessors shall 
144 require an annual statement certifying that the disability rating as determined by the Veterans 
145 Administration has not been reduced to less than one hundred per cent. 

of 8 146  No real estate shall be so exempt which the assessors shall adjudge has been conveyed to 
147 such soldier or sailor to evade taxation. 
148  Two thousand dollars of this exemption or up to the sum of one hundred and seventy-five 
149 dollars, whichever basis is applicable, shall be borne by the city or town; the balance, up to four 
150 thousand dollars of exemption or up to the sum of $825, whichever basis is applicable, shall be 
151 borne by the commonwealth; and the state treasurer shall annually reimburse the city or town for 
152 the amount of the tax which otherwise would have been collected on account of this balance.